Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.110

Data, information, interdepartmental assistance.

Where power is vested in a department or officer to inspect, examine, secure data or information from, or procure assistance from, another department or officer, such other department or officer shall submit to such inspection or examination, and furnish the data, information, or assistance required.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.17.110. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 128; RRS s 10886.]